Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-239
Bingo; taxation.

(1) The department shall collect a state tax of three percent on the gross receipts received from the conducting of bingo within the state. The tax shall be remitted to the department. The department shall remit the tax to the State Treasurer for credit to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund. The tax shall be remitted quarterly, not later than thirty days after the close of the preceding quarter, together with any other reports as may be required by the department.

(2) Unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska Bingo Act, no occupation tax on any receipts derived from the conduct of bingo shall be levied, assessed, or collected from any licensee under the act by any county, township, district, city, village, or other governmental subdivision or body having power to levy, assess, or collect such tax.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 42;

Laws 1979, LB 164, § 13;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 29;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 39;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-165;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 40;

Laws 1990, LB 1055, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 21;

Laws 1997, LB 99, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB638, § 5.